Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB4420.
People of the State of Michigan enact: Sec. 364a. (1) The public disclosure form for a legislatively directed spending item required under section 364 must be submitted in the following form to be considered: Legislatively Directed Spending Item Information 1. Sponsoring legislators full name: 2. Cosponsoring legislators names (if applicable): 3. Intended legislatively directed spending item recipient: 4. Physical address of legislatively directed spending item recipient and the intended location of the project or activity: 5. The recipients employer identification number: 6. Requested amount of the legislatively directed spending item: 7. What is the purpose and how does the legislatively directed spending item provide a public benefit that is an appropriate use of taxpayer money? 8. Has the legislatively directed spending item previously received or been awarded any of the following types of funding in the past 5 years? If so, how much? Check all that apply. [ ] Federal [ ] State [ ] Local 9. Estimated time frame for completion of the legislatively directed spending item project: Additional Information For Nonprofit Corporations (if applicable) The answer to questions 1 to 3 must be Yes for the nonprofit corporation to qualify for a legislatively directed spending item. 1. Has the nonprofit corporation continuously operated in this state for the preceding 36 months? [ ] Yes [ ] No 2. Has the nonprofit corporation had a physical office in this state for not less than the preceding 12 consecutive months? [ ] Yes [ ] No 3. Does the nonprofit corporation have a board of directors? [ ] Yes [ ] No 4. List all of the officers and active members on the board of directors: Certification By Sponsoring Legislator I certify that my immediate family members, legislative staff members, and I have no direct or indirect pecuniary interest in the requested legislatively directed spending item. I certify that the intended recipient of this legislatively directed spending item is not a for-profit entity. I certify that the information in this form is true to the best of my knowledge. Signature: ____________________________________ (2) As used in this section: (a) Immediate family member means any of the following individuals: (i) An individuals parent, child, sibling, or spouse. (ii) Any other individual who resides in the same household as the individual. (b) Legislatively directed spending item means that term as defined in section 364. (c) Legislator means a duly elected individual who serves in either the senate or house of representatives. (d) Nonprofit corporation means that term as defined in section 108 of the nonprofit corporation act, 1982 PA 162, MCL 450.2108. (e) Staff member means an individual who is currently or, within the prior 2 years, has been employed by the senate or house of representatives. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect January 1, 2026. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 596 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law. This act is ordered to take immediate effect. Clerk of the House of Representatives Secretary of the Senate Approved___________________________________________ ____________________________________________________ Governor